apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="هو__copula__vbser">

<e> <p><l>هوندس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هونداسي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندين</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندا</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندو</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندا</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e> <p><l>هوندس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هونديون</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--check-->
<e> <p><l>هوندي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هونديون</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هوندي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>هونديون</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


<e> <p><l>ٿيڻ</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>ٿيڻ</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>ٿيڻ</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>   <!--check-->

<e> <p><l>آهيان</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>آهيون</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e> <p><l>آهين</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>آهيو</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e> <p><l>آهي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e> <p><l>آهن</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e> <p><l>اٿس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<!--past-->
	<e> <p><l>هئس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هئاس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هوي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>ها</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هئا</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هو‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هوا‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هُئا</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هئا</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	<e> <p><l>‬هيس</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هياسين</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هوي‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هيو‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هوي‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هُئي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هئي</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e> <p><l>هيون‬</l><r>هو<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


<!-- FIXME ::
      <e><p><l>هوندي</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هوندو</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هوندي</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هوندا</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>‫پيو‬</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>‫هو‬</l><r>هو<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->

    </pardef>

    <e lm="هو"><i></i><par n="هو__copula__vbser"/></e>
